Utah statutes.
31A-27a-301.   Rehabilitation orders.
(1) (a)  An order to rehabilitate the business of an insurer shall:
(i)  appoint the commissioner and the commissioner's successors in office as
the rehabilitator;
(ii)  direct the rehabilitator to:
(A)  take possession and title of the assets of the insurer; and
(B)  administer the assets of the insurer under the general supervision of the
court; and
(iii)  require accountings to the receivership court by the rehabilitator.
(b)  Accountings shall be at the intervals the receivership court specifies in
its order, but no less frequently than semiannually.
(c)  Each accounting shall include a report concerning the rehabilitator's
opinion as to:
(i)  the likelihood that a plan under Section 31A-27a-303 will be prepared by
the rehabilitator; and
(ii)  the timetable for preparing the plan described in Subsection (1)(c)(i).
(2) (a)  In recognition of the need for a prompt and final resolution for all
persons affected by a plan of rehabilitation, any appeal from an order of
rehabilitation or an order approving a plan of rehabilitation shall be heard
on an expedited basis.
(b)  A stay of an order of rehabilitation or an order approving a plan of
rehabilitation may not be granted unless the appellant demonstrates that
extraordinary circumstances warrant delaying the recovery under the plan of
rehabilitation of all other persons, including policyholders.
(c)  If a plan of rehabilitation provides an appropriate mechanism for
adjustment in the event of an adverse ruling from an appeal, a stay may not be
granted.
